Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1903
Plumbing board members; compensation.

On being appointed, the members of the plumbing board shall each receive as a salary an amount to be determined by the city council or chairperson and village board of trustees.

Laws 1901, c. 21, § 12, p. 325;

R.S.1913, § 5276;

C.S.1922, § 4499;

C.S.1929, § 19-303;

R.S.1943, § 19-303;

Laws 1955, c. 54, § 1, p. 176;

Laws 1961, c. 57, § 3, p. 211;

Laws 1973, LB 103, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 36, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB107, § 3.